District of Columbia statutes.
19-1111

Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person, in good faith and without a court order, may act on instructions of, or otherwise deal with, a person purporting to make a transfer as, or purporting to act in the capacity of, a custodial trustee. In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, the third person is not responsible for determining:

(1)

The validity of the purported custodial trustee’s designation;

(2)

The propriety of, or the authority under this chapter for, any action of the purported custodial trustee;

(3)

The validity or propriety of an instrument executed or instruction given pursuant to this chapter either by the person purporting to make a transfer or declaration or by the purported custodial trustee; or

(4)

The propriety of the application of property vested in the purported custodial trustee.

July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-177, § 2(b), 49 DCR 5092

History